src/import/nouns.lexc
@P.Stem.Nom@sabotaaž+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s`abot´aaž TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sabotöör+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s`abot´öör TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sabrik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sabrik VIRSIK ;
sadalane+N:sadalane OLULINE ;
sadam+N:sadam MAGUS ;
sadamakai+N:sadama#k´ai ARMEE ;
sadamakõrts+N:sadama#k´õrts TAUD ;
sadamalinn+N:sadama#l´inn%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
sadamasild+N:sadama#s´ilD1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
sadamasuu+N:sadama#s´uuH3Y3%>%{id%}%{stemill%} PUU ;
sadamatamm+N:sadama#t´amm TAUD ;
sade+N:sade HAARE ;
sademed+N:sade HAARE ;
sadesti+N:sadesti AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sadestus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sadestus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sadestuvus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sadestuvus SUULINE ;
sadevesi+N:sade#veS1%{stemill%} MESI ;
sadism+N:sad´ism TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sadist+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sad´ist TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sadistlikkus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sad´istl´ikkus OLULINE ;
sado-masohhism+N:sado-masohh´ism TAUD ;
sadu+N:saJ1D1u KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sadul+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sadul MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@saduldus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@saduldus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@saduser+N:@P.Stem.Nom@saduser TAUD ;
saekaater+N:sae#k´aatE2r REDEL ;
saepukk+N:sae#p´ukk TAUD ;
saepuru+N:sae#puru KAVA ;
safari+N:safari AASTA ;
safian+N:safian MUUSEUM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@safiir+N:@P.Stem.Nom@saf´iir TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@safran+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s´afran REDEL ;
sagar+N:sagar MAGUS ;
sagarik+N:s`agar´ik ELANIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sagedus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sagedus OLULINE ;
sagedusriba+N:sagedus#riba KAVA ;
sagedusvahemik+N:sagedus#v`ahem´ik ELANIK ;
sagimine+N:sagimine OLULINE ;
sagin+N:sagin MAGUS ;
sagripea+N:sagri#p´E6A6H3Y3%>%{id%}%{stemill%} PUU ;
sagrispea+N:sagris#p´E6A6H3Y3%>%{id%}%{stemill%} PUU ;
sagu+N:saG1u KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sahariin+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s`ahar´iin TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sahhariid+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s`ahhar´iid TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sahhariin+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s`ahhar´iin TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sahharoos+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s`ahhar´oos TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sahib+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sahib REDEL ;
sahin+N:sahin MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sahk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s´ahK1%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
sahkerdaja+N:sahkerdaja AASTA ;
sahkerdamine+N:sahkerdamine OLULINE ;
sahkermahker+N:s´ahker#m´ahkE2r REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sahmak+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sahmak VIRSIK ;
sahmakas+N:sahmaka LOHAKAS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sahtel+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s´ahtE2l REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sahver+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s´ahvE2r REDEL ;
sahvriaken+N:s´ahvri#´akkE2n PIPAR ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sahvt+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s´ahvt TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sahvtisus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sahvtisus OLULINE ;
sai+N:s´ai%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
saiake+N:saiake PEENIKE ;
saialõhn+N:saia#l´õhn%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
saiapood+N:saia#p´ooD1 TAUD ;
saiapäts+N:saia#p´ät,s TAUD ;
saiaraha+N:saia#raha KAVA ;
saiavili+N:saia#v´il,J1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
saida+N:saida PERE ;
saiga+N:saiga PERE ;
saira+N:saira PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sait+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s´ait TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Single@sajadollariline+N:@P.Stem.Single@saja#d´ollariline OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Single@sajakroonine+N:@P.Stem.Single@saja#kroon,ine SOOLANE ;
sajaline+N:sajaline OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sajand+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sajand REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sajandialgus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sajandi#´algus SUULINE ;
sajandik+N:s`ajand´ik ELANIK ;
sajandilõpp+N:sajandi#l´õpp%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sajandivahetus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sajandi#vahetus OLULINE ;
sajane+N:sajane SOOLANE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sajatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sajatus OLULINE ;
sajusabin+N:saju#sabin MAGUS ;
sakalane+N:sakalane OLULINE ;
sake+N:sake PERE ;
sake+N:s´akkE2 HAARE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sakk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s´akk TAUD ;
sako+N:sako PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sakrament+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s`akram´en,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@saks+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s´aks TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@saks+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s´aks%>%{pl.u%} KAEL ;
saksaelu+N:saksa#elu%{stemill%} KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@saksapärasus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@saksa#pärasus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@saksastus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@saksastus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@saksauul+N:@P.Stem.Nom@saksa´uul TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@saksavaenulikkus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@saksa#v`aenul´ikkus SUULINE ;
saksavärk+N:saksa#v´ärk TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@saksikus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@saksikus OLULINE ;
sakslane+N:s´akslane SUULINE ;
sakslanna+N:s´akslanna PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sakslus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s´akslus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@saksofon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@saksofon TAUD ;
saksofonimängija+N:saksofoni#m´ängija AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@saksofonist+N:@P.Stem.Nom@saksofon´ist TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sakumm+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sak´umm TAUD ;
sakuska+N:sak`us,ka PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sakusment+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s`akusm´en,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sakutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sakutus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sakvuajaaž+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sakvuaj´aaž TAUD ;
sala+N:sala KAVA ;
salaagent+N:sala#ag´en,t TAUD ;
salaami+N:salaami PERE ;
salaasi+N:sala#´as,J1%>%{pl.u%} ASI ;
@P.Stem.Nom@saladus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@saladus OLULINE ;
saladuselinik+N:saladuse#linik VIRSIK ;
saladuseloor+N:saladuse#l´oor TAUD ;
saladuskate+N:saladus#k´atT1e PINGE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@saladuslikkus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s`aladusl´ikkus SUULINE ;
salainfo+N:sala#info PERE ;
salajutt+N:sala#j´utt%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@salakaebus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sala#k´aebus SUULINE ;
salakaubavedaja+N:sala#kauba#vedaja AASTA ;
salakaubavedu+N:sala#kauba#veD1u KAVA ;
salakaup+N:sala#k´aup%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
salakiri+N:sala#k´irJ1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@salakirjateadus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sala#kirja#t´eadus SUULINE ;
salakomme+N:sala#k´omB1e PINGE ;
salakraav+N:sala#kr´aav TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@salakraavitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sala#kraavitus OLULINE ;
salakuulaja+N:sala#k´uulaja AASTA ;
salakuulamine+N:sala#k´uulamine OLULINE ;
salakäik+N:sala#k´äik%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
salakütus+N:sala#kütus SOOLANE ;
salaluure+N:sala#l´uure PINGE ;
salamander+N:sala#m´andE2r REDEL ;
salamõte+N:sala#m´õtT1e PINGE ;
salapaik+N:sala#p´aik%>%{pl.u%} ASI ;
salapolitsei+N:sala#p`olits´ei ARMEE ;
salapolitseinik+N:sala#polits´ein´ik ELANIK ;
salapära+N:sala#pära KAVA ;
salapäratseja+N:sala#päratseja AASTA ;
salarelv+N:sala#r´elv%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
salasepitseja+N:sala#sepitseja AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@salasepitsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sala#sepitsus OLULINE ;
salasoov+N:sala#s´oov TAUD ;
salasopp+N:sala#s´opp TAUD ;
salastamine+N:salastamine OLULINE ;
salasund+N:sala#s´unD1 TAUD ;
salasõna+N:sala#sõna%>%{pl.u%} KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@salat+N:@P.Stem.Nom@salat REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@salateenistus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sala#teenistus OLULINE ;
salatikast+N:salati#k´as,t TAUD ;
salatseja+N:salatseja AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@salatsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@salatsus OLULINE ;
salatubakas+N:sala#tubaka LOHAKAS ;
salatuisk+N:sala#t´uisK1%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
salaviin+N:sala#v´iin%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@salaviinandus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sala#viinandus OLULINE ;
salaühing+N:sala#ühing VIRSIK ;
saldo+N:saldo PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@saledus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@saledus OLULINE ;
saleduskuur+N:saledus#k´uur TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@salgamatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s´algamatus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@salk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s´alk%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@salk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s´alk%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
salkkond+N:s´alkk´onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
salklane+N:s´alklane SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sall+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s´al,l TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sallimatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s´al,limatus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sallitavus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sal,litavus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sallivus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s´al,livus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@salm+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s´al,m TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@salmiaak+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sal,mi´aak TAUD ;
salmialbum+N:sal,mi#´album REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@salmik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sal,mik VIRSIK ;
salmimeister+N:sal,mi#m´eistE2r REDEL ;
salmisepp+N:sal,mi#s´epp%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
salmitegija+N:sal,mi#tegija AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@salmonelloos+N:@P.Stem.Nom@salmonell´oos TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@salong+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sal´ong TAUD ;
salongimuusika+N:sal`ongi#muusika AASTA ;
salongiõhtu+N:sal`ongi#´õhtu AASTA ;
salooga+N:salooga PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@salpeeter+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s´alp´eetE2r REDEL ;
salsa+N:salsa PERE ;
salto+N:salto PERE ;
saltomortaale+N:salto#mortaale PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@saltser+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s´altser REDEL ;
salu+N:salu%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
salumets+N:salu#m´ets%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@saluut+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sal´uut TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@salv+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s´al,v TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@salv+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s´alv%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} EIT ;
salvei+N:s´alv´ei ARMEE ;
